Oklahoma, session 2025, SB954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:





Req. No. 345 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Antisemitism” means a certain perception of Jews, which may


be expressed as hatred toward Jews. Rhetorical and physical


manifestations of antisemitism are directed toward Jewish or non-


Jewish individuals or their properties, Jewish community


institutions, and Jewish religious facilities. Antisemitism does


not mean criticism of Israel that is similar to criticism toward any


other country. The provisions of this paragraph shall include any


amendments adopted by the International Holocaust Remembrance


Alliance;


2. “Institution of higher education” means an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education; and


3. “Public school” shall have the same meaning as provided for


in Section 1-106 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Discrimination on the basis of race, ethnicity, national


origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a


student or an employee in an institution of higher education or a


public school in this state shall be prohibited. No person in this


state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,


disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from

Req. No. 345 Page 2


participating in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to


discrimination under any institution of higher education or public


school program or activity or in any employment conditions or


practices conducted by an institution of higher education or a


public school that receives or benefits from federal or state


financial assistance.


C. The criteria for admission to a program or course at an


institution of higher education shall not have the effect of


restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,


national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.


D. All institution of higher education and public school


classes shall be available to all students without regard to race,


ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital


status. Provided, however, the provisions of this subsection shall


not prohibit the provision of programs designed to meet the needs of


students with limited proficiency in English, gifted students, or


students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with


specialized talents or skills.


E. Guidance, counseling, and financial assistance services in


institutions of higher education and public schools shall be


available to all students equally and provided in the same manner


regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability,


religion, or marital status.



Req. No. 345 Page 3


F. All education programs, activities, and opportunities


offered by institutions of higher education and public schools shall


be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,


ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital


status.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-163 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Institutions of higher education and public schools shall


integrate the definition of antisemitism provided for in Section 1


of this act into their student, faculty, and employee codes of


conduct with penalties for violations identical to racism and


prohibit such conduct at or by the institution and public school.


Prohibited conduct as it specifically relates to antisemitism shall


be incorporated and include harassing conduct and discrimination


against Jews.


B. Institutions of higher education and public schools shall


treat harassment of or discrimination against students or employees


or resulting from institutional policies or programs on their


campuses motivated by or including antisemitic intent in an


identical manner to discrimination motivated by race.


C. Evidence of antisemitic intent shall include, but not be


limited to:



Req. No. 345 Page 4


1. Encouraging, supporting, praising, participating in, or


threatening violence or vandalism against Jews or Jewish property;


2. Praising designated terrorist groups such as Hamas or any


group or individual calling for the genocide or killing of Jews;


3. Wearing masks to conceal one’s identity with the intent to


demonstrate in general including, but not limited to, harassing or


discriminating against Jewish or other students, faculty, and


employees on campus property;


4. Participating in or supporting the boycott, divestment, or


sanctions of Israeli companies, institutions, or individuals


including by any institution of higher education endowment;


5. Allowing or participating in antisemitic events, such as


encampments, lock-ins, walk-outs, or similar demonstrations on


campus property when such events intimidate, harass, or otherwise


violate Title VI protections provided for Jewish students. Students


who participate in such events and miss class as a result shall


receive unexcused absences and failure grades for any assignments or


examinations taking place on such dates of participation; or


6. Incorporating or allowing funding of antisemitic curriculum


or activity in any domestic or study abroad programs or classes.


D. All institutions of higher education and public schools are


encouraged to:


1. Incorporate antisemitism awareness training for all


students, faculty, administrators, and campus police; and

Req. No. 345 Page 5


2. Integrate Jewish American heritage curriculum for students


that incorporates Jewish experiences in the United States of America


pre- and post-revolution, pre- and post-World War II and the


Holocaust, and in modern times.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-164 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the


State Board of Education shall monitor, assess, and report on the


performance of institutions of higher education, public school


districts, and public schools with antisemitic activity. If the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or the State Board of


Education, after reasonable investigation, determines that the


institution of higher education, public school district, or


individual public school has engaged in, allowed, or not


sufficiently disciplined prohibited antisemitic activity, the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or the State Board of


Education shall give written notice to the institution of higher


education, public school district, or individual public school to


address its concerns no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of


the notice.


B. If the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or the


State Board of Education determines the institution of higher


education, public school district, or individual public school has

Req. No. 345 Page 6


not taken necessary actions by the expiration of the thirty-day


period, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


immediately report same to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Legislature


shall impose at least a one-percent reduction in funding against the


institution of higher education or the public school district. The


Legislature may impose additional punitive actions as it deems


necessary.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-165 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish or


infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the


United States Constitution or Section 22 of Article II of the


Oklahoma Constitution.


B. Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with


federal or state discrimination laws.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-345 EB 1/19/2025 5:46:39 AM

Req. No. 345 Page 7